Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1287.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 503.1 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended to read:Section 503.1. Water Supply.--Every ordinance adopted pursuant to this article shall include a provision that, if 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 water is to be provided by means other than by private wells owned and maintained by the individual owners of lots within the subdivision or development, applicants shall present evidence to the governing body or planning agency, as the case may be, that the subdivision or development is to be supplied by a certificated public utility, a bona fide cooperative association of lot owners, or by a municipal corporation, authority or utility. A copy of a Certificate of Public Convenience from the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission or an application for such certificate, a cooperative agreement or a commitment or agreement to serve the area in question, whichever is appropriate, shall be acceptable evidence. The evidence must be presented before final subdivision and land development approval.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1287PN1597 - 2 - 123456789101112131415